GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-prop.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€äàáâ]
!# CONTENT:     unlassified proper names
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	14-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# OLD/tmp.fem
!# OLD/tmp.masc
!#
!# MARKERS 
!# !* = from old FSTs
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# NOTE: Need classification!
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols

+Prop

+Sci
+Leg
+Misc

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abbr 

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT

!# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# masculine names
!# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
CIMLE+Prop+Sci+Acron		MPL;	!*	!=Circuitos% Integrados% de% Muita% Larga% Escala
ESPRIT+Prop+Sci			MSG;
Guernica+Prop+Misc		MSG;
Haemophilus+Prop+Sci		MSG;
IPMF+Prop+Leg+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Imposto% Provisorio% sobre% Movimentação% Financeira
IPI+Prop+Leg+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Imposto% sobre% Produtos% Industriais
IPC+Prop+Leg+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Índiçe% de% Preços% ao% Consumidor
influenzae+Prop+Sci		MSG;
Júpiter+Prop+Sci		MSG;
Kama-Sutra+Prop+Misc		MSG;
Lusíadas+Prop+Misc		MPL;
Marte+Prop+Sci			MSG;
Mercúrio+Prop+Sci		MSG;
!miligramas/dia+Prop+Sci		MPL;
meq+Prop+Sci+Acron		MPL;	!*	!=milliequivalents
Neptuno+Prop+Sci		MSG;
Plutão+Prop+Sci			MSG;
PIB+Prop+Leg+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Produto% Interno% Bruto
PNB+Prop+Leg+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Produto% Nacional% Bruto
Profir+Prop+Leg			MSG;
Proteus+Prop+Sci		MSG;
pyrethrum+Prop+Sci		MSG;
Saturno+Prop+Sci		MSG;
STI+Prop+Sci+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Sistema% de% Troca% de% Informações
Streptomyces+Prop+Sci		MSG;
Urano+Prop+Sci			MSG;
Vénus+Prop+Sci			MSG;
Watergate+Prop+Misc		MSG;
Windows+Prop+Misc		MSG;
XX+Prop+Sci			MSG;
XY+Prop+Sci			MSG;

!# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# feminine names
!# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
CETESB+Prop+Leg			FSG;
Escherichia+Prop+Sci		FSG;
Ltda.+Prop+Leg+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Limitada
PMEs+Prop+Leg+Acron		FPL;	!*	!=Pequenas% e% Médias% Empresas
P&D+Prop+Sci+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Pesquisa% e% Desenvolvimento
PM+Prop+Leg+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Polícia% Militar
PIC+Prop+Sci+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Produção% Integrada% per% Computador
S/A+Prop+Leg+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Sociedade% Anónima
S.A.+Prop+Leg+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Sociedade% Anónima
S/A+Prop+Leg+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Sociedade% Anônima
S.A.+Prop+Leg+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Sociedade% Anônima
TI+Prop+Sci+Acron		FPL;	!*	!=Tecnologias% de% Informação
TV+Prop+Sci+Acron		FSG;	!*	!=Televisão
